test/src/morphology/N-tup_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tup: # Noun 79 'eng /est tupp/fin' - full paradigm
     tup+N+Sg+Nom: tup
     tup+N+Sg+Gen: tup
     tup+N+Sg+Par: tuppõ
     tup+N+Sg+Dat: tuppõn
     tup+N+Sg+Ins: tuppõks
     tup+N+Sg+Ill: tuppõ
     tup+N+Sg+Ela: tupstõ
     tup+N+Pl+Nom: tupūd
     tup+N+Pl+Gen: tupūd
     tup+N+Pl+Par: tupīdi
     tup+N+Pl+Dat: tupūdõn
     tup+N+Pl+Ins: tupūdõks
     tup+N+Pl+Ill: tupīž
     tup+N+Pl+Ela: tupīst
